Maryland, session 2026, HB1191.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Business Regulation
12–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) (1) “Dealer” means:
(i) an individual who acquires commercially from the public or
trades commercially with the public in secondhand precious metal objects;
(ii) an individual who for compensation arranges for the sale or
delivery of a secondhand precious metal object on behalf of a person that does not hold a
license under this title; [or]
(iii) unless otherwise provided, a pawnbroker; OR
(IV) A TEMPORARY EVENT–BASED DEALER.
(2) “Dealer” includes a retail jeweler as to transactions in which the retail
jeweler acquires commercially from the public or trades commercially with the public in
secondhand precious metal objects.
(d) “Fixed business address” means a single physical location in Maryland where
a licensee regularly conducts business and at which the licensee or an employee of the
licensee is physically present:
(1) during normal business hours; or
(2) other hours as provided in the application for the license which are
sufficient to provide an authorized law enforcement officer or agent access to the licensee’s
place of business as provided in § 12–306 of this title.
(e) “License” means a license issued by the Secretary to do business as a dealer.
(E–1) “LIMITED LICENSE” MEANS A LICENSE ISSUED BY THE SECRETARY TO
DO BUSINESS AS A TEMPORARY EVENT–BASED DEALER.

HOUSE BILL 1191 3
(L) “TEMPORARY EVENT–BASED DEALER” MEANS A PERSON WHO
ACQUIRES COMMERCIALLY FROM THE PUBLIC OR TRADES COMMERCIALLY WITH
THE PUBLIC IN SECONDHAND PRECIOUS METAL OBJECTS AT DISCRETE EVENTS OF
LIMITED DURATION AT ONE OR MORE LOCATIONS THAT:
(1) ARE NOT THE PERMANENT PLACE OF BUSINESS OF THE LIMITED
LICENSEE; AND
(2) ARE THE PERMANENT PLACES OF BUSINESS OF ONE OR MORE
LICENSEES UNDER THIS TITLE.
12–201.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this title, an individual shall have a license
before the individual does business as a dealer in the State.
(b) Except those pawnbrokers who are exempt from State licensing under §
12–102(c) of this title, all pawnbrokers must be licensed as dealers.
(C) A PERSON SHALL HAVE A LIMITED LICENSE BEFORE THE PERSON DOES
BUSINESS AS A TEMPORARY EVENT–BASED DEALER IN THE STATE.
12–202.1.
(A) AN APPLICANT THAT DOES NOT MAINTAIN A FIXED BUSINESS ADDRESS
IN THE STATE MAY APPLY TO THE SECRETARY FOR A LIMITED LICENSE UNDER THIS
SUBTITLE.
(B) (1) AN APPLICANT FOR A LIMITED LICENSE SHALL:
(I) SUBMIT TO THE SECRETARY AN APPLICATION ON THE FORM
THAT THE SECRETARY PROVIDES; AND
(II) PAY TO THE SECRETARY AN APPLICATION FEE OF $300.
(2) THE APPLICATION FEE IS NONREFUNDABLE.
(C) THE APPLICANT SHALL SIGN THE APPLICATION UNDER OATH.
(D) IN ADDITION TO ANY OTHER INFORMATION THAT THE SECRETARY
REQUIRES, THE APPLICATION SHALL STATE:
(1) THE NAME AND PRINCIPAL ADDRESS OF THE APPLICANT;

HOUSE BILL 1191
(2) A TELEPHONE NUMBER AT WHICH THE APPLICANT CAN BE
REACHED DURING NORMAL BUSINESS HOURS;
(3) EACH ADDRESS WHERE THE APPLICANT HAS CONDUCTED ANY
BUSINESS DURING THE 36 MONTHS BEFORE APPLICATION;
(4) THE NAME AND PERMANENT ADDRESS OF EACH EMPLOYEE WHO
WILL WORK WITH THE APPLICANT IN THE BUSINESS OF THE APPLICANT AS A
TEMPORARY EVENT–BASED DEALER;
(5) (I) THE FIXED BUSINESS ADDRESS OF AN INDIVIDUAL
LICENSED UNDER THIS TITLE WHERE THE APPLICANT PRIMARILY WILL CONDUCT
BUSINESS AS A TEMPORARY EVENT–BASED DEALER;
(II) THE NAME AND TELEPHONE NUMBER OF AN INDIVIDUAL
WHO HAS AUTHORITY TO GRANT ACCESS TO THE PREMISES AT THE FIXED BUSINESS
ADDRESS SPECIFIED IN ITEM (I) OF THIS ITEM AND WHO CAN BE REACHED DURING
NORMAL BUSINESS HOURS; AND
(III) THE INFORMATION SPECIFIED IN ITEMS (I) AND (II) OF THIS
ITEM FOR EACH ADDITIONAL FIXED BUSINESS ADDRESS OF AN INDIVIDUAL
LICENSED UNDER THIS TITLE WHERE THE APPLICANT WILL CONDUCT BUSINESS AS
A TEMPORARY EVENT–BASED DEALER, IF ANY; AND
(6) THE FIXED ADDRESS IN THE STATE WHERE PRECIOUS METAL
OBJECTS WILL BE STORED, PROVIDED, HOWEVER, THAT A BANK OR SAFE DEPOSIT
BOX IS NOT AN ACCEPTABLE STORAGE LOCATION UNLESS WRITTEN CONSENT BY
THE APPLICANT AND A BANK OFFICIAL AUTHORIZING ACCESS TO THE STORAGE
FACILITY AND EXAMINATION OF ITS CONTENTS BY LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICERS
OR AGENTS ACCOMPANIES THE APPLICATION.
(E) THE APPLICATION FORM SHALL CONTAIN, IMMEDIATELY ABOVE THE
SIGNATURE LINE, THE FOLLOWING:
“IF ISSUED A LIMITED LICENSE, I AGREE TO ALLOW A MUNICIPAL, COUNTY, OR
STATE POLICE OFFICER OR AGENT ACTING IN THE COURSE OF A STOLEN PROPERTY
INVESTIGATION OR AN INVESTIGATION OF A VIOLATION OF TITLE 12 OF THE
BUSINESS REGULATION ARTICLE TO INSPECT AND PHOTOGRAPH ALL PRECIOUS
METAL OBJECTS AND RECORDS AT MY BUSINESS OR STORAGE LOCATIONS.”.
12–205.
(a) Upon receipt of a complete national and State criminal record report from the
Central Repository in accordance with § 12–204 of this subtitle, the Secretary shall issue a

HOUSE BILL 1191 5
license OR LIMITED LICENSE to each applicant who meets the requirements of this
subtitle.
(b) The Secretary:
(1) may issue a license only for a fixed business address; but
(2) may not issue a license for an address that is:
(i) a hotel or motel room;
(ii) a motor vehicle;
(iii) a post office box; or
(iv) a location which does not meet the qualifications as defined in §
12–101(d) of this title.
(c) The Secretary may not issue more than 1 license for any single business
location unless the dealers at that location are in partnership.
(d) The Secretary may not issue a license OR LIMITED LICENSE to a minor.
(e) Whenever a license is suspended or revoked, another license may not be issued
to a dealer for the same business location unless the applicant provides the documentation
and information, which the Secretary establishes by regulation, is necessary to
demonstrate that the applicant will be engaging in a business which is separate and
independent from the business of the revoked or suspended license.
(F) THE SECRETARY MAY ISSUE A LIMITED LICENSE TO A PERSON FOR THE
PURPOSE OF DOING BUSINESS AS A TEMPORARY EVENT–BASED DEALER AT ONE OR
MORE FIXED BUSINESS ADDRESSES OF INDIVIDUALS LICENSED UNDER THIS
SUBTITLE.
12–206.
(a) A license authorizes the licensee to do business as a dealer only at the address
for which the license is issued.
(b) Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, a dealer who holds a license
under this subtitle may:
(1) make purchases at an estate and judicial sale; and
(2) transact business at the residence of the owner of a precious metal
object or a place where the owner keeps a precious metal object:

HOUSE BILL 1191
(i) on request of the owner; and
(ii) after giving written notice of the proposed transaction and its
location to the local law enforcement unit with jurisdiction over that location.
(C) (1) A LIMITED LICENSE AUTHORIZES THE LIMITED LICENSEE TO DO
BUSINESS AS A TEMPORARY EVENT–BASED DEALER ONLY AT THE FIXED BUSINESS
ADDRESSES OF INDIVIDUALS LICENSED UNDER THIS TITLE INCLUDED IN THE
LICENSEE’S APPLICATION FOR A LIMITED LICENSE.
(2) FOR THE PURPOSES OF THIS TITLE, THE FIXED BUSINESS
ADDRESS OF AN INDIVIDUAL LICENSED UNDER THIS TITLE WHERE THE LIMITED
LICENSEE PRIMARILY WILL CONDUCT BUSINESS AS A TEMPORARY EVENT–BASED
DEALER SHALL BE CONSIDERED THE FIXED BUSINESS ADDRESS OF THE LIMITED
LICENSEE.
(3) THE HOLDER OF A LIMITED LICENSE SHALL BE RESPONSIBLE FOR
ALL RECORD–KEEPING REQUIREMENTS, RECORD RETENTION REQUIREMENTS,
HOLDING PERIOD REQUIREMENTS, AND INSPECTION REQUIREMENTS IMPOSED ON
DEALERS UNDER SUBTITLES 3 AND 4 OF THIS TITLE.
12–207.
(a) Unless a license OR LIMITED LICENSE is renewed for a 2–year term as
provided in this section, the license OR LIMITED LICENSE expires on the first April 30 that
comes:
(1) after the effective date of the license OR LIMITED LICENSE; and
(2) in an even–numbered year.
(b) (1) At least 1 month before a license OR LIMITED LICENSE expires, the
Secretary shall mail or electronically transmit to the licensee OR LIMITED LICENSEE:
(i) a renewal application form; and
(ii) a notice that states:
1. the date on which the current license OR LIMITED
LICENSE expires; and
2. the amount of the renewal fee.

HOUSE BILL 1191 7
(2) If an electronic transmission under paragraph (1) of this subsection is
returned to the Secretary as undeliverable, the Secretary shall mail to the licensee OR
LIMITED LICENSEE, at the last known address of the licensee OR LIMITED LICENSEE,
the materials required under paragraph (1) of this subsection within 10 business days of
the date the Secretary received the notice that the electronic transmission was
undeliverable.
(c) Before a license OR LIMITED LICENSE expires, the licensee OR LIMITED
LICENSEE periodically may renew it for an additional 2–year term, if the licensee OR
LIMITED LICENSEE:
(1) submits to the Secretary a renewal application on the form that the
Secretary provides;
(2) signs the renewal application under oath;
(3) updates the information submitted in the original application and
states that the information is current;
(4) except as provided in subsection (d) of this section, agrees to comply
with each requirement applicable to the original application;
(5) states that the licensee OR LIMITED LICENSEE:
(i) has not violated this title;
(ii) has not been convicted of an offense specified in § 12–209 of this
subtitle; and
(iii) has not had a similar license denied, suspended, or revoked in
another jurisdiction;
(6) otherwise is entitled to be licensed; and
(7) pays to the Secretary a renewal fee of $265.
(d) The Secretary may require a licensee OR LIMITED LICENSEE to submit a
national and State criminal history records check with the renewal application.
(e) The Secretary shall renew the license of each licensee, OR THE LIMITED
LICENSE OF EACH LIMITED LICENSEE, who meets the requirements of this section.
(f) A license OR LIMITED LICENSE is not transferable and may be used only to
benefit the licensee OR LIMITED LICENSEE.

HOUSE BILL 1191
(g) (1) A licensee may change the place of business for which a license is issued
only if the licensee:
(i) submits to the Secretary an application to transfer the license to
a new business location on a form that the Secretary provides; and
(ii) receives the written approval of the Secretary.
(2) A LIMITED LICENSEE MAY CHANGE THE LIST OF FIXED BUSINESS
ADDRESSES OF INDIVIDUALS LICENSED UNDER THIS TITLE WHERE THE LIMITED
LICENSEE IS AUTHORIZED TO CONDUCT BUSINESS ONLY IF THE LIMITED LICENSEE:
(I) SUBMITS TO THE SECRETARY AN APPLICATION TO CHANGE
THE LOCATIONS ON A FORM THAT THE SECRETARY PROVIDES; AND
(II) RECEIVES THE WRITTEN APPROVAL OF THE SECRETARY.
[(2)] (3) Within 45 days after the application is filed with the Secretary,
the Secretary shall approve or disapprove the application and notify the licensee OR
LIMITED LICENSEE of the approval or disapproval, in writing.
[(3)] (4) If the Secretary approves a proposed change of place of business,
the licensee shall:
(i) submit to the Secretary a current list of names of each employee
to be employed at the new location; and
(ii) attach the written approval of the Secretary to the license until
an amended license is received by the licensee.
(5) IF THE SECRETARY APPROVES A PROPOSED CHANGE TO THE
LOCATIONS WHERE A LIMITED LICENSEE IS AUTHORIZED TO CONDUCT BUSINESS
UNDER PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE LIMITED LICENSEE SHALL
ATTACH THE WRITTEN APPROVAL OF THE SECRETARY TO THE LIMITED LICENSE
UNTIL AN AMENDED LIMITED LICENSE IS RECEIVED BY THE LIMITED LICENSEE.
(h) The Secretary may determine that licenses AND LIMITED LICENSES issued
under this subtitle shall expire on a staggered basis.
12–208.
(a) (1) Each licensee shall display the license conspicuously in the place of
business of the licensee.

HOUSE BILL 1191 9
(2) EACH LIMITED LICENSEE SHALL DISPLAY THE LIMITED LICENSE
CONSPICUOUSLY AT EACH LOCATION THAT THE LIMITED LICENSEE ACTS AS A
TEMPORARY EVENT–BASED DEALER.
(b) (1) Only a licensed dealer OR LIMITED LICENSEE may advertise for the
commercial trading with the public or acquiring from the public in secondhand precious
metal objects.
(2) An advertisement for the commercial trading with the public or
acquiring from the public in secondhand precious metal objects shall include the name and
license number of the licensee OR LIMITED LICENSEE, in compliance with applicable
regulations adopted by the Department.
12–209.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “LICENSE” INCLUDES A LIMITED LICENSE ISSUED
UNDER THIS TITLE.
[(a)] (B) (1) Except as otherwise provided, in this subsection, a dealer’s or
applicant’s agents, employees, management personnel, or partners include only those
individuals who are directly involved in pawn transactions or the acquisition or sale of
secondhand precious metals on behalf of the dealer or applicant.
(2) Subject to the hearing provisions of § 12–210 of this subtitle, the
Secretary may deny a license to an applicant, reprimand a licensee, or suspend or revoke a
license if the applicant or licensee or an agent, employee, manager, or partner of the
applicant or licensee:
(i) fraudulently or deceptively obtains or attempts to obtain a
license for the applicant or licensee or for another person;
(ii) fraudulently or deceptively uses a license;
(iii) has a similar license denied, suspended, or revoked in another
jurisdiction;
(iv) under the laws of the United States or of any state, is convicted
of a:
1. felony; or
2. misdemeanor that is directly related to the fitness and
qualification of the applicant or licensee to be involved in a pawn transaction or the sale or
acquisition of secondhand precious metals;

HOUSE BILL 1191
(v) knowingly employs or knowingly continues to employ, after being
notified by the Secretary, an individual who, under the laws of the United States or of any
state, is convicted of:
1. a felony; or
2. a misdemeanor that is directly related to the fitness and
qualification of the employee to be involved in a pawn transaction or the sale or acquisition
of secondhand precious metals;
(vi) knowingly employs or knowingly continues to employ in any
capacity, after being notified by the Secretary, an individual whose precious metals dealer’s
license has been revoked;
(vii) willfully fails to provide or willfully misrepresents any
information required to be provided under this title;
(viii) violates this title; or
(ix) violates a regulation adopted under this title.
(3) (i) Instead of or in addition to reprimanding a licensee or
suspending or revoking a license under this subsection, the Secretary may impose a penalty
not exceeding $5,000 for each violation.
(ii) To determine the amount of the penalty imposed under this
subsection, the Secretary shall consider:
1. the seriousness of the violation;
2. the harm caused by the violation;
3. the good faith of the licensee; and
4. any history of previous violations by the licensee.
(4) The Secretary shall pay any penalty collected under this subsection into
the General Fund of the State.
(5) The Secretary shall distribute periodically to all dealers a list of
individuals whose licenses have been revoked in the State.
[(b)] (C) (1) If a licensee is charged with a violation of this title that could
result in suspension or revocation of the license, or if the Secretary has probable cause to
believe that this title has been, or will be, violated through transactions likely to occur
pursuant to § 12–206 of this subtitle, the Secretary may seek from a circuit court an
immediate restraining order to prohibit the licensee from:

HOUSE BILL 1191 11
(i) buying or selling a secondhand precious metal object;
(ii) disposing of a secondhand precious metal object; or
(iii) disposing of a record about a secondhand precious metal object.
(2) The restraining order is in effect until:
(i) the court lifts the order;
(ii) the charges are adjudicated or dismissed; or
(iii) in the case of an event held in accordance with § 12–206 of this
subtitle, arrangements are made by the licensee which will ensure compliance with the
provisions of this title.
[(c)] (D) The Secretary shall consider the following facts in the granting, denial,
renewal, suspension, or revocation of a license or the reprimand of a licensee when an
applicant or licensee is convicted of a felony or misdemeanor described in subsection
[(a)(2)(iv)] (B)(2)(IV) of this section:
(1) the nature of the crime;
(2) the relationship of the crime to the activities authorized by the license;
(3) with respect to a felony, the relevance of the conviction to the fitness
and qualification of the applicant or licensee to act as a pawnbroker or a secondhand
precious metal object dealer;
(4) the length of time since the conviction; and
(5) the behavior and activities of the applicant or licensee before and after
the conviction.
12–210.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “LICENSE” INCLUDES A LIMITED LICENSE ISSUED
UNDER THIS TITLE.
[(a)] (B) Except as otherwise provided in § 10–226 of the State Government
Article, before the Secretary takes any final action under § 12–209 of this subtitle, the
Secretary shall give the individual against whom the action is contemplated an opportunity
for a hearing before the Secretary.

HOUSE BILL 1191
[(b)] (C) The Secretary shall give notice and hold the hearing in accordance with
Title 10, Subtitle 2 of the State Government Article.
[(c)] (D) The Secretary may administer oaths in a proceeding under this section.
[(d)] (E) If, after due notice, the individual against whom the action is
contemplated does not appear, nevertheless the Secretary may hear and determine the
matter.
12–212.
The Secretary shall inform each primary law enforcement unit of each license OR
LIMITED LICENSE that is issued, renewed, changed to a new business location, denied,
suspended, or revoked.
12–303.
Unless otherwise authorized by the Secretary, a dealer shall keep the records
required by this subtitle, at a location within the State, for 3 years after the date of the
transaction.
12–304.
(a) (1) A dealer shall submit the required information from each record to the
primary law enforcement unit in accordance with subsection (b) of this section.
(2) If the dealer transacts business in accordance with § 12–206(b) of this
title, the dealer also shall submit the required information from the records to the local law
enforcement unit in accordance with subsection (b) of this section.
(3) On the request of a dealer, the Secretary shall provide to the dealer a
list of local law enforcement units.
(b) (1) Subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection, the dealer shall submit the
records by transmitting the required information from the records electronically, in a
format acceptable to the receiving law enforcement unit, by noon of the next business day.
(2) A dealer may request an extension of up to 48 hours to submit the
records required under paragraph (1) of this subsection.
(c) Each record, submitted to the primary law enforcement unit and, if applicable,
local law enforcement unit, shall include:
(1) the license OR LIMITED LICENSE number of the dealer;
(2) the location of each item listed in the record; and

HOUSE BILL 1191 13
(3) the information required under § 12–302 of this subtitle.
(d) The required information from a record submitted under this section:
(1) shall be kept confidential;
(2) is not a public record; and
(3) is not subject to Title 4 of the General Provisions Article.
(e) The primary law enforcement unit shall adopt a procedure for a dealer to
amend a record required to be submitted under this section.
(f) A law enforcement unit may cease to maintain a record submitted under this
section after 1 year from the date the law enforcement unit receives the copy.
12–305.
(a) (1) (i) 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section, a dealer who
acquires a precious metal object shall keep it in the county where the dealer holds a license
from the time of acquisition until at least 18 days after submitting a copy of a record of its
acquisition under § 12–304 of this subtitle.
2. Notwithstanding subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph, the
18–day holding period established under this subparagraph applies to a precious metal
object that:
A. a dealer licensed in Prince George’s County acquired in a
pawn transaction; and
B. an individual seeks to redeem by presenting the original
ticket issued as part of the pawn transaction.
12–306.
(a) A dealer shall allow an authorized law enforcement officer or agent, on
request, to enter the place of business or storage premises of the dealer during business
hours to inspect a record required to be maintained under this title or precious metal object
as part of a stolen property investigation or an investigation of a violation of this title.
(b) (1) On request of the dealer, the officer or agent shall make the inspection
in the presence of the dealer or an agent of the dealer.
(2) If the dealer refuses to allow access or produce the record or precious
metal object for inspection, the officer or agent shall seek a search warrant.

HOUSE BILL 1191
(3) A warrant authorizing an administrative inspection for possible
regulatory violations shall be issued if the officer or agent establishes probable cause for
the selection of the place of business in question for inspection and that the inspection will
be reasonably limited in time, place, and scope.
(c) A dealer who refuses to allow access or to produce records or precious metal
objects for inspection on request, shall be subject to the provisions of § 12–209 of this title
and, in addition, may be assessed a civil penalty as provided in subsection (d) of this section.
(d) (1) The Secretary may impose on a licensee OR LIMITED LICENSEE who
violates this section a civil penalty not exceeding $500 for each violation.
(2) In setting the amount of a civil penalty under this subsection, the
Secretary shall consider:
(i) the seriousness of the violation;
(ii) the good faith of the violator;
(iii) any previous violations;
(iv) the harmful effect of the violation on the complainant, the public,
and the business of the dealer or pawnbroker; and
(v) any other relevant factors.
12–403.
(a) If there is probable cause to believe that a violation of this title has occurred,
the Secretary shall have the authority to issue subpoenas for records, reports, or articles in
connection with any investigation or administrative proceeding under this title.
(b) If a licensee [or a licensee’s], A LICENSEE’S EMPLOYEE, A LIMITED
LICENSEE, OR A LIMITED LICENSEE’S employee fails to comply with a subpoena issued
under this section, on petition of the Secretary, a circuit court may compel compliance with
the subpoena.
12–501.
Except as otherwise provided in this title, a person may not do business as a dealer
in the State unless the person has a license OR A LIMITED LICENSE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.